Utah statutes.
41-1a-220.   Lost or damaged registration card.

If a registration card is lost, mutilated, or becomes illegible the owner of the vehicle for which the registration card was issued, as shown by the records of the division, shall immediately:

(1)  apply for a duplicate;

(2)  furnish the information satisfactory to the  division; and

(3)  pay the proper fees.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

